Maine, session 132, LD1573.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 37-B MRSA §742, sub-§1, ¶F is enacted to read:
F. The Governor, during the pendency of a state of emergency, may not reissue or
renew an emergency proclamation, issue another emergency proclamation that is
substantially similar to one that expired or reissue an emergency proclamation
terminated by the Legislature without approval of the Legislature.